Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
Cross references.

Criminal penalties for transmitting false report of fire, transmitting a false public alarm and making restitution, or refusing to obey official request at fire or other emergency, §§

16-10-27

,

16-10-28

,

16-10-30

.

Farmers’ mutual fire insurance companies, T. 33, C. 16.

Property insurance generally, T. 33, C. 32.

Management of emergencies generally, T. 38, C. 3.

Liability of officers and agents for acts performed while fighting fires or for acts performed at scenes of emergencies, § 51-1-30.